test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s1x26_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - mála: # 
    mála+V+Inf: mála
    mála+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [málir, málar]
    mála+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [máldi, málaði]
    mála+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [máldu, málaðu]
    mála+V+Sup: [mált, málað]
    mála+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [máldur, málaður]
